District of Columbia statutes.
13-446

Application to Superior Court.

An application to the Superior Court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under § 13-443 shall comply with the Rules of the Superior Court and laws of the District and shall be submitted to the Superior Court.

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.